Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.700

[Art. 95] Resistance, breach of arrest, and escape.

Any person subject to this code who resists apprehension or breaks arrest or who escapes from physical restraint lawfully imposed shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 94.]